Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section, “complex rehabilitation technology” means
manual or  power wheelchair systems, adaptive seating systems, alternative positioning sys-
tems, adaptive strollers, standing frames, gait trainers or specifically  designated options or
accessories that are:
(a) Classified as durable medical equipment; and
(b) Individually configured for a specific  individual to meet the individual’s unique med-
ical, physical or functional needs and capacities for basic activities of daily living and in-
strumental activities of daily living, including employment.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority or a coordinated  care organization shall make a deter-
mination on a request for prior authorization for medical  assistance coverage for the cost
to repair complex rehabilitation technology within 72 hours after receiving the request.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies to contracts between a coordinated care
organization and the Oregon Health Authority  entered into, amended or renewed on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 549 (SB 549-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 549 (SB 549-A) Page 2